Tennessee, session 114, HB2307.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-5-509(a), is amended by deleting
"a written" and substituting "a written or electronic".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2307
012022
- 1 -